Illinois, session 104th, SB1631.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 2-101, 2-105, and 2-107 as follows:  6    (40 ILCS 5/2-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 2-101)7    Sec. 2-101. Creation of system. A retirement system is 8created to provide retirement annuities, survivor's annuities 9and other benefits for certain members of the General 10Assembly, certain elected state officials, and their 11beneficiaries. 12    The system shall be known as the "General Assembly 13Retirement System". All its funds and property shall be a 14trust separate from all other entities, maintained for the 15purpose of securing payment of annuities and benefits under 16this Article. 17    Participation in the retirement system created under this 18Article is restricted to persons who became participants 19before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 20General Assembly. Beginning on that date, the System shall not 21accept any new participants. 22(Source: P.A. 83-1440.)   SB1631- 2 -LRB104 09530 RPS 19593 b1    (40 ILCS 5/2-105)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 2-105)2    Sec. 2-105. Member. "Member": Members of the General 3Assembly of this State, including persons who enter military 4service while a member of the General Assembly, and any person 5serving as Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, 6Treasurer, Comptroller, or Attorney General for the period of 7service in such office. 8    Any person who has served for 10 or more years as Clerk or 9Assistant Clerk of the House of Representatives, Secretary or 10Assistant Secretary of the Senate, or any combination thereof, 11may elect to become a member of this system while thenceforth 12engaged in such service by filing a written election with the 13board. Any person so electing shall be deemed an active member 14of the General Assembly for the purpose of validating and 15transferring any service credits earned under any of the funds 16and systems established under Articles 3 through 18 of this 17Code. 18    However, notwithstanding any other provision of this 19Article, a person shall not be deemed a member for the purposes 20of this Article unless he or she became a participant of the 21System before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 22104th General Assembly. 23(Source: P.A. 85-1008.) 24    (40 ILCS 5/2-107)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 2-107)25    Sec. 2-107. Participant. "Participant": Any member who   SB1631- 3 -LRB104 09530 RPS 19593 b1elects to participate; and any former member who elects to 2continue participation under Section 2-117.1, for the duration 3of such continued participation. However, notwithstanding any 4other provision of this Article, a person shall not be deemed a 5participant for the purposes of this Article unless he or she 6became a participant of the System before the effective date 7of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.8(Source: P.A. 86-1488.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.